Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-2394
Deposit guaranty bond; statement required.

A bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution provides a deposit guaranty bond pursuant to the Public Funds Deposit Security Act if it issues a deposit guaranty bond which runs to the director or custodial official, as applicable, and which is conditioned that the bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution shall, upon written request by the director or custodial official, as applicable, at the end of each and every month, render to the director or custodial official, as applicable, a statement showing the daily balances and the amounts of public money or public funds of the governing authority held by it during the month and how credited. The public money or public funds shall be paid promptly on the order of the custodial official depositing the public money or public funds.

Laws 1996, LB 1274, § 9;

Laws 2001, LB 362, § 89;

Laws 2019, LB622, § 5;

Laws 2021, LB66, § 3.